Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. Revocation, Suspension, Surrender, and Reinstatement of Licenses.

Sec. 06.20.110.
Grounds for revocation of license.

The department shall, under the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62), revoke any license issued under this chapter if it finds that

the licensee has failed to pay the annual license fee or to maintain the required bond in effect or has failed to comply with any lawful demand, ruling, or requirement of the department made under and within the authority of this chapter;

the licensee has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation lawfully adopted by the department under and within the authority of this chapter; or

any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time of the original application for the license, clearly would have constituted ground for denial of the issuance of the license.

History.

(§ 10 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The act of charging an interest rate in excess of that prescribed in AS

45.45.080(b)

on a loan in excess of $1,000 (now $25,000) is grounds for revocation of the lender’s small loan license, regardless of whether the loan is consummated or administered in the same place of business. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Sec. 06.20.120.
Revocation or suspension where licensee has branches.

Where a licensee holds more than one license, the department may revoke or suspend any license for which grounds for the action exist.

History.

(§ 10 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Sec. 06.20.130.
Surrender.

A licensee may surrender a license by delivering written notice of the surrender to the department. The surrender does not affect the licensee’s civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender.

History.

(§ 10 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Sec. 06.20.140.
Effect of revocation, suspension, or surrender.

A revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license does not impair or affect the legally enforceable obligation of any pre-existing contract between the licensee and any borrower.

History.

(§ 10 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Sec. 06.20.150.
Status of license; reinstatement.

Every license remains in force and effect until it is surrendered, revoked, or suspended as provided in this chapter. The department may reinstate, suspend licenses, or issue new licenses to a licensee whose license has been revoked if no fact or condition exists that clearly would have constituted ground for denial of the issuance of the license by the department.

History.

(§ 10 ch 73 SLA 1955)